lexc/noun/enhule.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl

+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter

§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§ §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez11§ §JPnull§ §Jnull§
§k§

LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, aa,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Case;
                         Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Case1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, aa,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                                  

LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                       
LEXICON Case1
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n


LEXICON AddNounlo
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famlo;

LEXICON Famlo
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genlo;
                       Genlo;

LEXICON Genlo
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caselo;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi       Caselo;
                         Caselo;
 
LEXICON Caselo
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Noun
almalé:almalev AddNoun1;
aloélé AddNoun;
anyaló AddNounlo;
anyaló:anyalov AddNoun1;
bablé AddNoun;
bablé:bablev AddNoun1;
banánlé AddNoun;
banánlé:banánlev AddNoun1;
befőttlé AddNoun;
befőttlé:befőttlev AddNoun1;
bendőlé AddNoun;
bendőlé:bendőlev AddNoun1;
bodzalé AddNoun;
bodzalé:bodzalev AddNoun1;
bogyólé AddNoun;
bogyólé:bogyólev AddNoun1;
borogatáslé AddNoun;
borogatáslé:borogatáslev AddNoun1;
brokkolilé AddNoun;
brokkolilé:brokkolilev AddNoun1;
bronzló AddNounlo;
burgonyalé:burgonyalev AddNoun1;
bábló AddNounlo;
bérló AddNounlo;
bérló:bérlov AddNoun1;
büröklé AddNoun;
bűzlé:bűzlev AddNoun1;
cefrelé AddNoun;
cementlé:cementlev AddNoun1;
centrálé AddNoun;
ciberelé:ciberelev AddNoun1;
citromlé AddNoun;
ciánlé:ciánlev AddNoun1;
cowboyló AddNounlo;
csaliló AddNounlo;
csaliló:csalilov AddNoun1;
csalánlé AddNoun;
csapadéklé:csapadéklev AddNoun1;
csataló AddNounlo;
csatornalé AddNoun;
csatornalé:csatornalev AddNoun1;
cserkeszló AddNounlo;
cserkeszló:cserkeszlov AddNoun1;
cserlé AddNoun;
cserzőlé:cserzőlev AddNoun1;
cserépló AddNounlo;
csirkehúslé AddNoun;
csirkehúslé:csirkehúslev AddNoun1;
csodalé AddNoun;
csodalé:csodalev AddNoun1;
csodaló AddNounlo;
csontlé:csontlev AddNoun1;
csudaló AddNounlo;
csukalé AddNoun;
csukalé:csukalev AddNoun1;
csávázólé AddNoun;
csávázólé:csávázólev AddNoun1;
cukorlé AddNoun;
cukorlé:cukorlev AddNoun1;
céklalé AddNoun;
céklalé:céklalev AddNoun1;
degesztőlé AddNoun;
degesztőlé:degesztőlev AddNoun1;
dohánylé AddNoun;
dohánylé:dohánylev AddNoun1;
dragonyosló AddNounlo;
dzsidásló AddNounlo;
dzsidásló:dzsidáslov AddNoun1;
díjló AddNounlo;
előfogatló AddNounlo;
előfogatló:előfogatlov AddNoun1;
endívialé AddNoun;
endívialé:endívialev AddNoun1;
esőlé AddNoun;
esőlé:esőlev AddNoun1;
ezüstló AddNounlo;
ezüstló:ezüstlov AddNoun1;
fajló AddNounlo;
faló AddNounlo;
faló:falov AddNoun1;
fecskendőpáclé AddNoun;
feketeribizlilé:feketeribizlilev AddNoun1;
felöntőlé AddNoun;
festéklé:festéklev AddNoun1;
festőlé AddNoun;
fiákerló AddNounlo;
fiákerló:fiákerlov AddNoun1;
fogatló AddNounlo;
fogatló:fogatlov AddNoun1;
férfiló AddNounlo;
fürdőlé AddNoun;
fürdőlé:fürdőlev AddNoun1;
főló AddNounlo;
főzőlé:főzőlev AddNoun1;
fűlé AddNoun;
gabonalé AddNoun;
galoppló AddNounlo;
galoppló:galopplov AddNoun1;
ganajlé AddNoun;
ganélé AddNoun;
ganélé:ganélev AddNoun1;
gebeló AddNounlo;
gennylé AddNoun;
gombóclé:gombóclev AddNoun1;
grapefruitlé AddNoun;
grépfrútlé AddNoun;
gubacslé:gubacslev AddNoun1;
gulyáslé AddNoun;
gyerekló AddNounlo;
gyermekló AddNounlo;
gyermekló:gyermeklov AddNoun1;
gyászló AddNounlo;
gyümölcslé AddNoun;
gépló AddNounlo;
görögdinnyelé:görögdinnyelev AddNoun1;
hablé AddNoun;
hajtóló AddNounlo;
hallé AddNoun;
hallé:hallev AddNoun1;
harcsalé AddNoun;
hendikepló AddNounlo;
hendikepló:hendikeplov AddNoun1;
heringlé AddNoun;
hintaló AddNounlo;
hintavíziló AddNounlo;
hintóló AddNounlo;
hintóló:hintólov AddNoun1;
hobbiló AddNounlo;
honvédló AddNounlo;
huszárló AddNounlo;
huszárló:huszárlov AddNoun1;
hátasló AddNounlo;
hígtrágyalé AddNoun;
hímló AddNounlo;
hímló:hímlov AddNoun1;
hólé AddNoun;
húslé AddNoun;
húsló AddNounlo;
húsló:húslov AddNoun1;
igásló AddNounlo;
iskolaló AddNounlo;
istenló AddNounlo;
istenló:istenlov AddNoun1;
iszaplé AddNoun;
jelzáloglé AddNoun;
juharlé:juharlev AddNoun1;
játékló AddNounlo;
kakaólé AddNoun;
kancaló AddNounlo;
kancaló:kancalov AddNoun1;
kaszáslé AddNoun;
katonaló AddNounlo;
kellékló AddNounlo;
keveréklé:keveréklev AddNoun1;
kezdőló AddNounlo;
kocsiló AddNounlo;
kocsisló AddNounlo;
kocsonyalé AddNoun;
kocsonyalé:kocsonyalev AddNoun1;
komplé AddNoun;
konflisló AddNounlo;
konflisló:konflislov AddNoun1;
korhelyhalászlé AddNoun;
kovászlé AddNoun;
kozákló AddNounlo;
kozákló:kozáklov AddNoun1;
kukoricamálé AddNoun;
káposztalé AddNoun;
káposztalé:káposztalev AddNoun1;
kölcsönló AddNounlo;
köleslé AddNoun;
köleslé:köleslev AddNoun1;
kőló AddNounlo;
levendulalé AddNoun;
luxusló AddNounlo;
luxusló:luxuslov AddNoun1;
lé AddNoun;
ló     AddNounlo;
macskaló AddNounlo;
majoránnalé:majoránnalev AddNoun1;
malátalé AddNoun;
mangólé AddNoun;
marhahúslé:marhahúslev AddNoun1;
mazsolalé AddNoun;
meggylé AddNoun;
mentalé:mentalev AddNoun1;
meseló AddNounlo;
miniló AddNounlo;
mintaló AddNounlo;
mocsoklé AddNoun;
mocsoklé:mocsoklev AddNoun1;
mosogatólé AddNoun;
munkaló AddNounlo;
máklé:máklev AddNoun1;
málhásló AddNounlo;
málnalé AddNoun;
ménló AddNounlo;
ménló:ménlov AddNoun1;
mészkénlé AddNoun;
műló AddNounlo;
narancslé AddNoun;
narancslé:narancslev AddNoun1;
nikotinlé AddNoun;
nyomtatóló AddNounlo;
nyárfalé:nyárfalev AddNoun1;
nyírfalé AddNoun;
orchidealé AddNoun;
pacallé:pacallev AddNoun1;
panírlé AddNoun;
paradicsomlé AddNoun;
parasztgombóclé:parasztgombóclev AddNoun1;
parasztló AddNounlo;
parkló AddNounlo;
parádésló AddNounlo;
pecsenyelé AddNoun;
pecsenyelé:pecsenyelev AddNoun1;
pejló AddNounlo;
permetlé AddNoun;
pinceló AddNounlo;
pinceló:pincelov AddNoun1;
platánlé AddNoun;
plüssló AddNounlo;
pocsolyalé:pocsolyalev AddNoun1;
postaló AddNounlo;
postásló AddNounlo;
préslé AddNoun;
puncilé:puncilev AddNoun1;
puncslé AddNoun;
pálmalé AddNoun;
párolólé:párolólev AddNoun1;
pólóló AddNounlo;
póniló AddNounlo;
póréhagymalé AddNoun;
pótló AddNounlo;
pótló:pótlov AddNoun1;
regényhandlé AddNoun;
rendőrló AddNounlo;
reteklé:reteklev AddNoun1;
ribizlilé AddNoun;
rizslé AddNoun;
robotló AddNounlo;
robotló:robotlov AddNoun1;
rézló AddNounlo;
sakkló AddNounlo;
salaklé AddNoun;
salaklé:salaklev AddNoun1;
salátapáclé AddNoun;
spenótlé AddNoun;
spenótlé:spenótlev AddNoun1;
sportló AddNounlo;
szalmaló AddNounlo;
szalonnalé AddNoun;
szalonnalé:szalonnalev AddNoun1;
szappanlé AddNoun;
szecskalé AddNoun;
szecskalé:szecskalev AddNoun1;
szennylé AddNoun;
szilvalé AddNoun;
szilvalé:szilvalev AddNoun1;
szobaló AddNounlo;
szénsavasgyümölcslé AddNoun;
szörplé:szörplev AddNoun1;
szőlőlé AddNoun;
sárgarépalé AddNoun;
sárlé:sárlev AddNoun1;
sólé AddNoun;
sörlé AddNoun;
sörló AddNounlo;
sörló:sörlov AddNoun1;
sörösló AddNounlo;
taligásló AddNounlo;
tanló AddNounlo;
tanítóló:tanítólov AddNoun1;
taposóló AddNounlo;
teherló AddNounlo;
tejesmálé:tejesmálev AddNoun1;
tenyésztőlé AddNoun;
terepló AddNounlo;
tigrisló:tigrislov AddNoun1;
tojáslé AddNoun;
tornaló AddNounlo;
tornaló:tornalov AddNoun1;
trágyalé AddNoun;
társzekérló AddNounlo;
társzekérló:társzekérlov AddNoun1;
tésztalé AddNoun;
törpeló AddNounlo;
törpeló:törpelov AddNoun1;
túraló AddNounlo;
túrólé AddNoun;
tüzérló:tüzérlov AddNoun1;
ugarló AddNounlo;
utazóló AddNounlo;
utazóló:utazólov AddNoun1;
vadló AddNounlo;
vakló AddNounlo;
vakló:vaklov AddNoun1;
varázshalászlé AddNoun;
vendégló AddNounlo;
versenyló:versenylov AddNoun1;
vezetékló AddNounlo;
vágóló AddNounlo;
vágóló:vágólov AddNoun1;
vámosló AddNounlo;
víziló:vízilov AddNoun1;
zöldbablé AddNoun;
állatorvosló AddNounlo;
állatorvosló:állatorvoslov AddNoun1;
édesgyökérlé AddNoun;
ércló:érclov AddNoun1;
ősló AddNounlo;
